Maine, session 132, LD1596.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6072, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Definitions. As used in this section and section 6072-A, unless the context
otherwise indicates, the following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Bottom operations" means an operational type that primarily involves:
(1) The deposit of the principal aquaculture gear on the ocean bottom. The
principal aquaculture gear for bottom operations includes, but is not limited to,
shellfish cages, bags or netting designed to contain or protect shellfish from
predation; or
(2) The deposit of marine organisms to be cultured directly on the ocean bottom
without the use of aquaculture gear, other than netting to protect the organisms
from predation, including, but not limited to, direct deposit of shellfish seed on the
ocean bottom.
B. "Operational type" means, with respect to an aquaculture operation conducted
pursuant to a lease issued under this section or section 6072-A, the method by which
the aquaculture operation engages in aquaculture. An aquaculture operation may have
only one operational type. "Operational type" includes bottom operations, submerged
operations or surface operations.
C. "Principal aquaculture gear" means the gear or equipment primarily used to engage
in aquaculture by an aquaculture operation conducted pursuant to a lease issued under
this section or section 6072-A. "Principal aquaculture gear" does not include marker
buoys or mobile vessels used for transit to and from the lease site.
D. "Submerged operations" means an operational type that primarily involves the
suspension of the principal aquaculture gear below the ocean surface where that gear
is not connected to a major floating structure on the ocean surface and does not come
in contact with the ocean bottom. The principal aquaculture gear for submerged
operations, which may be connected to surface buoys in a manner designed to maintain
the position of the gear in the water column and above the ocean bottom, includes, but
is not limited to, seaweed or shellfish longlines, shellfish cages, shellfish lantern nets
or pearl nets, scallop gear, hanging lines or shellfish spat collectors.
E. "Surface operations" means an operational type that primarily involves the principal
aquaculture gear floating on the ocean surface or suspended from the surface and
connected to a major floating structure on the ocean surface, such as a raft or work
float, in a manner that provides easy access to the marine organisms cultured,
regardless of whether such aquaculture gear is seasonally deposited on the ocean
bottom to avoid winter storms or icing. The principal aquaculture gear for surface
operations includes, but is not limited to, mussel rafts, shellfish bags or cages or
floating upweller systems.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6072, sub-§4, ¶H, as enacted by PL 1987, c. 453, §1, is
amended to read:
H. Include an environmental evaluation of the site upon which the decision to seek a
lease was made. The evaluation shall must include, but not be limited to, bottom
characteristics, resident flora, fauna and hydrography of the site if appropriate for the
Page 1 - 132LR2087(01)

414 proposed lease. If an applicant is required to include a video recording of the site or
425 other information collected through a site dive as part of the environmental evaluation
436 under this paragraph and the applicant is required to pay the cost associated with the
447 site dive, the department shall allow the applicant to contract with any qualified 3rd-
458 party entity to conduct the site dive and may not require the site dive to be conducted
469 by a 3rd-party entity selected by the department;
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6072, sub-§5-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 660, Pt. A, §5, is
further amended to read:
5-A. Department site review. Prior to the lease hearing, the department shall conduct
an assessment of the proposed site and surrounding area to determine the possible effects
of the lease on commercially and ecologically significant flora and fauna and conflicts with
traditional fisheries and all other uses. If the department requires a video recording of the
site or other information collected through a site dive as part of the assessment under this
subsection and the applicant is required to pay the cost associated with the site dive, the
department shall allow the applicant to contract with any qualified 3rd-party entity to
conduct the site dive and may not require the site dive to be conducted by a 3rd-party entity
selected by the department. This information The information from the assessment must be
provided to the intervenors and made available to the public 30 days before the hearing. As
part of the site review, the department shall request information from the municipal harbor
master about designated or traditional storm anchorages in proximity to the proposed lease.
The commissioner may by rule establish levels of assessment appropriate to the scale or
potential environmental risk posed by a proposed lease activity. The rules must provide a
method of establishing a baseline to monitor the environmental effects of a lease activity.
Rules adopted under this subsection are major substantive rules as defined by Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 4. 12 MRSA §6072, sub-§13-B is enacted to read:
13-B. Modification of operational type or principal aquaculture gear.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary and in accordance with rules
adopted by the department pursuant to this subsection, a person holding an aquaculture
lease issued pursuant to this section may modify the operational type of the person's
aquaculture operation or the design of the principal aquaculture gear used by the person
without the need for an amendment to the person's issued lease, as long as:
A. As determined by the commissioner, the modification will not significantly increase
navigational hazards caused by the aquaculture operation or the environmental effects
of the aquaculture operation;
B. The modification will not cause the operational type of the aquaculture operation
to change from bottom operations or submerged operations to surface operations; and
C. The modification will not cause the operational type of the aquaculture operation
to change from bottom operations to submerged operations.
The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted by the
department pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. 12 MRSA §6072-A, sub-§10-A is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR2087(01)

10-A. Site dive requirement. If the department requires a video recording or other
information to be collected through a site dive of a proposed lease site under this section
and the applicant is required to pay the cost associated with the site dive, the department
shall allow the applicant to contract with any qualified 3rd-party entity to conduct the site
dive and may not require the site dive to be conducted by a 3rd-party entity selected by the
department.
Sec. 6. 12 MRSA §6072-A, sub-§20-B is enacted to read:
20-B. Modification of operational type or principal aquaculture gear.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary and in accordance with rules
adopted by the department pursuant to this subsection, a person holding an aquaculture
lease issued pursuant to this section may modify the operational type of the person's
aquaculture operation or the design of the principal aquaculture gear used by the person
without the need for an amendment to the person's issued lease, as long as:
A. As determined by the commissioner, the modification will not significantly increase
navigational hazards caused by the aquaculture operation or the environmental effects
of the aquaculture operation;
B. The modification will not cause the operational type of the aquaculture operation
to change from bottom operations or submerged operations to surface operations; and
C. The modification will not cause the operational type of the aquaculture operation
to change from bottom operations to submerged operations.
The department shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. Rules adopted by the
department pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 7. 12 MRSA §6080, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Subcommittee established. The chair and vice-chair of the council shall establish
and appoint council members to a subcommittee of the council to study and address equity
issues for persons seeking to enter the aquaculture industry and seeking to access
aquaculture grants; issues encountered by small aquaculture facilities; and methods of
ensuring the aquaculture industry is inclusive and representative of the State as a whole.
The subcommittee shall report its findings and any recommendations to the council in a
manner directed by the chair and vice-chair.
Sec. 8. Department of Marine Resources; shellfish hatchery guidelines. The
Department of Marine Resources shall establish guidelines for the operation and
administration of shellfish hatcheries that receive state funding and that are operated by
tribal governments or by nonprofit organizations or other nongovernmental entities. The
department shall make the guidelines established pursuant to this section available to those
entities and to the public and shall take all reasonable actions to ensure compliance with
the guidelines by those entities.